Utah statutes.
78B-6-1108.   Nuisance -- Abatement by eviction.
(1)  Whenever there is reason to believe that a nuisance under Sections
78B-6-1107 through 78B-6-1114 is kept, maintained, or exists in any county,
the county attorney of the county, the city attorney of any incorporated city,
any citizen or citizens of the state residing in the county, or any
corporation, partnership or business doing business in the county, in his or
their own names, may maintain an action in a court of competent jurisdiction
to abate the nuisance and obtain an order for the automatic eviction of the
tenant.
(2)  The court may designate a spokesperson of any group of citizens who would
otherwise have the right to maintain an action in their individual names
against the defendant under this section.
